Utah statutes.
7-23-104.1.   No effect on civil liability.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit any civil liability that may exist against a check casher or deferred deposit lender for:

(1)  breach of contract;

(2)  violation of federal law; or

(3)  other unlawful act.

